Washington statutes.
RCW 38.42.020

Applicability of chapter.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1440-S2.SL) ***

(1) Any service member who is ordered to report for military service and his or her dependents are entitled to the rights and protections of this chapter during the period beginning on the date on which the service member receives the order and ending one hundred eighty days after termination of or release from military service.

(2) This chapter applies to any judicial or administrative proceeding commenced in any court or agency in Washington state in which a service member or his or her dependent is a party. This chapter does not apply to criminal proceedings.

(3) This chapter shall be construed liberally so as to provide fairness and do substantial justice to service members and their dependents.

[ 2014 c 65 s 2; 2005 c 254 s 2.]